Mississippi statutes. Title 61. Aviation
Chapter 3. Airport Authorities
§ 61-3-79.
Municipal cooperation with authority.

For the purpose of aiding and cooperating in the planning, undertaking, construction, or operation of airports and air navigation facilities pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, any municipality for which an authority has been created or any municipality in which any of the property of the authority is located or which is contiguous to any property of the authority may, upon such terms, with or without consideration, as it may determine:

Lend or donate money to the authority;

Provide that all or a portion of the taxes or funds available or to become available to, or required by law to be used by, the municipality for airport purposes, be transferred or paid directly to the airport authority as such funds become available to the municipality;

Cause water, sewer, or drainage facilities, or any other facilities which it is empowered to provide, to be furnished onto or in connection with such airports or air navigation facilities;

Dedicate, sell, convey, or lease any of its interest in any property, or grant easements, licenses, or any other rights or privileges therein to the authority;

Furnish, dedicate, close, pave, install, grade, regrade, plan or replan streets, roads, roadways, and walks from established streets or roads to such airports or air navigation facilities;

Do any and all things, whether or not specifically authorized in this section and not otherwise prohibited by law, that are necessary or convenient to aid and cooperate with the authority in the planning, undertaking, construction, or operation of airports and air navigation facilities; and

Enter into agreements with the authority respecting action to be taken by the municipality pursuant to the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-47; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 17; Laws, 2012, ch. 450, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 19, 2012.).

§ 61-3-81.
Effect of chapter upon municipal airport zoning regulation.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to limit any right, power, or authority of a municipality to regulate airport hazards by zoning.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-49; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 19.

§ 61-3-83.
Acquisition, etc., of airports, air navigation facilities, etc.; tort liability.

The acquisition of any land, or interest therein, pursuant to this chapter, the planning, acquisition, establishment, development, construction, improvement, maintenance, equipment, operation, regulation and protection of airports and air navigation facilities, including the acquisition or elimination of airport hazards, and the exercise of any other powers granted in this chapter to authorities and other public agencies, to be severally or jointly exercised, are hereby declared to be public and governmental functions, exercised for a public purpose and matters of public necessity. All land and other property and privileges acquired and used by or on behalf of any authority or other public agency in the manner and for the purposes enumerated in this chapter shall and are hereby declared to be acquired and used for public and governmental purposes and as a matter of public necessity.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-45; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 15; Laws, 1983, ch. 528; Laws, 1984, ch. 495, § 31; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1985, ch. 474, § 30; Laws, 1986, ch. 438, § 43; Laws, 1987, ch. 483, § 44; Laws, 1988, ch. 442, § 41; Laws, 1989, ch. 537, § 39; Laws, 1990, ch. 518, § 40; Laws, 1991, ch. 618, § 40; Laws, 1992, ch. 491 § 42, eff from and after passage (approved May 12, 1992).

§ 61-3-85.
Certain persons prohibited from deriving income from issuance of bonds.

No member of the Legislature, elected official or appointed official, or any partner or associate of any member of the Legislature, elected official or appointed official, shall derive any income from the issuance of any bonds under Sections 61-3-35, 61-3-39, 61-3-41, 61-3-45, 61-3-51, or 61-3-53 contrary to the provisions of Section 109, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, or Article 3, Chapter 4, Title 25, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 520, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1991).